Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB573.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, the "Flag of Remembrance" means the "Freedom Flag,"
which was designated by the Commonwealth of Virginia in 2018 as the official
flag of remembrance of September 11, 2001, and is described in subsection (3) of
this section.
(2) The Flag of Remembrance may be flown along with the American flag and the
state flag of the Commonwealth of Kentucky each September 11, which is known
as Patriot Day under 36 U.S.C. sec. 144, as a remembrance of September 11,
2001.
(3) The Freedom Flag shall be designed as follows:
(a) The inner portion of the flag shall feature a blue background to represent
all Americans united together for freedom;
(b) The blue background shall have a white star to represent all who lived and
died for freedom;
(c) Five (5) white bars shall surround the white star to represent the Pentagon
and the organized protection of American freedom;
(d) The outer portion of the flag shall feature three (3) white stripes, two (2)
narrow red stripes, and two (2) broad red stripes;
(e) The three (3) white stripes on the outer portion of the flag represent the
rescue workers, firefighters, police officers, port authority employees, and
others who worked tirelessly during and after the terrorist attacks of
September 11, 2001;
(f) The two (2) broad red stripes on the outer portion of the flag represent the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1794
Twin Towers and the loss of the people who perished at the World Trade
Center and the crew and passengers on American Airlines Flight 11 and
United Airlines Flight 175;
(g) The top narrow red stripe on the outer portion of the flag represents the loss
of the people who perished at the Pentagon and the crew and passengers on
American Airlines Flight 77; and
(h) The bottom narrow red stripe on the outer portion of the flag represents the
loss of the crew and passengers of United Airlines Flight 93 in
Pennsylvania.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:36 PM Jacketed